Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.080

Existing agreements not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to annul, modify, or preclude the renewal or continuation of any lawful agreement entered into before October 1, 2002, between an employer and an employee organization covering wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment.

[ 2002 c 356 s 20.]